Maryland, session 2026, HB0448.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
19–2502.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0448*

HOUSE BILL 448
(a) The Department shall approve a credentialing entity to develop and
administer a certification process for recovery residences.
(b) The credentialing entity shall:
(1) Establish recovery residence certification requirements;
(2) Establish processes to administer the application, certification, and
recertification process;
(3) Establish processes to monitor and inspect a recovery residence;
(4) Conduct an on–site inspection of a recovery residence:
(i) Before issuing a certificate of compliance; and
(ii) At least once during each certification renewal period; and
(5) Issue a certificate of compliance on approval of the application process
and the inspection of the recovery residence.
(c) A certificate of compliance issued by the credentialing entity is valid for 1 year
from the date of issuance.
(d) The credentialing entity may revoke the certificate of compliance of a certified
recovery residence if [the]:
(1) THE credentialing entity finds that the recovery residence is not in
compliance with the requirements established by the credentialing entity; OR
(2) INSTRUCTED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER § 19–2502.1(B)(2) OF
THIS SUBTITLE.
19–2502.1.
(A) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONDUCT AT LEAST TWO
UNANNOUNCED ON–SITE INSPECTIONS OF EACH CERTIFIED RECOVERY RESIDENCE
EACH YEAR TO ENSURE THE CERTIFIED RECOVERY RESIDENCE’S COMPLIANCE WITH
STATUTORY AND REGULATORY REQUIREMENTS.
(2) THE UNANNOUNCED ON–SITE INSPECTIONS REQUIRED UNDER
THIS SUBSECTION ARE IN ADDITION TO THE ON–SITE INSPECTION CONDUCTED BY
THE CREDENTIALING ENTITY FOR THE PURPOSE OF RECERTIFICATION UNDER §
19–2502(B)(4)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE.

HOUSE BILL 448 3
(B) (1) IF, AFTER AN INSPECTION IS CONDUCTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES THAT A CERTIFIED RECOVERY
RESIDENCE IS NOT IN COMPLIANCE WITH STATUTORY OR REGULATORY
REQUIREMENTS, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) PROVIDE NOTICE TO THE CERTIFIED RECOVERY
RESIDENCE OF THE DEFICIENCIES IDENTIFIED; AND
(II) ALLOW THE CERTIFIED RECOVERY RESIDENCE 1 MONTH
AFTER THE NOTICE IS PROVIDED TO ADDRESS THE DEFICIENCIES.
(2) IF THE DEPARTMENT DETERMINES A DEFICIENCY EXISTS AND,
AFTER THE 1–MONTH PERIOD, THE CERTIFIED RECOVERY RESIDENCE FAILS TO
TAKE CORRECTIVE ACTION, THE DEPARTMENT MAY INSTRUCT THE CREDENTIALING
ENTITY TO REVOKE THE CERTIFICATION OF THE CERTIFIED RECOVERY RESIDENCE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.